test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s60_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - taka: # 
    taka+V+Inf: taka
    taka+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: tekur
    taka+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: tók
    taka+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: tóku
    taka+V+Sup: tikið
